Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.260

Proceedings to be heard without jury.

Proceedings under this chapter are special proceedings, and shall be heard by the judge or referee before whom the same are returnable without a jury, except as provided in RCW 6.32.270.

[ 1923 c 160 s 3; 1893 c 133 s 26; RRS s 638.]